West Virginia, session 2026, SB866.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. PERSONAL INCOME TAX. §11-21-80. Capital gain tax exemption on gold, silver and cryptocurrency. (a) For the purposes of this section:"Cryptocurrency" means a digital currency in which transactions are verified and records maintained by a decentralized system using cryptography, rather than by a centralized authority."Precious metal bullion" means coins, bars or rounds containing primarily refined gold and silver that is marked and valued primarily by its weight, purity, and content; and(b) Gross income does not include any net capital gain derived from the exchange of precious metal bullion and cryptocurrency and shall be exempt from income tax under this article.